Utah statutes.
48-2a-401.   Admission of additional general partners.
After the filing of a limited partnership's original certificate of limited
partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in
writing in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not
provide in writing for the admission of additional general partners, with the
written consent of all partners.
